Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2221
Notice; other requirements; waiver.

A person, including a guardian ad litem, conservator, or other fiduciary, may waive notice or any other requirement for the mailing or receipt of instruments by a writing signed by him or his attorney and filed in the proceeding.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 21, UPC § 1-402;

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 34.